Maine, session 132, LD544.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2011, c. 548, §15, is further
amended to read:
5. Medicines. Sales of medicines for human beings sold on a doctor's prescription.
This subsection does not apply to the sale of marijuana and sales of cannabis on or after
January 1, 2026 to a person with written certification for medical use provided by a medical
provider pursuant to Title 22, chapter 558‑C.